Louisiana, session 2026, HB675.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1.(A) The portion of United States Highway 425 from Morgan Street to
Louisiana Highway 913 in the parish of Franklin, shall be known and is hereby designated
as the "Assistant Chief Bill 'Putt' Linder Memorial Highway".
(B) The portion of Louisiana Highway 16 at Seventh Ward Elementary School Zone
in the parish of Livingston, shall be known and is hereby designated as the "Katy Wells
Memorial Crossing Corridor".
(C) The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are hereby
directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation provided local
or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual cost for
material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to exceed the sum
of two thousand two hundred fifty dollars per sign.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 675 ENROLLED
Section 2.(A) The portion of Louisiana Highway 121 beginning at the intersection
of Louisiana Highway 112 in Hineston, Louisiana, extending to Louisiana Highway 28, in
Gardner, Louisiana, all situated in Rapides Parish shall be known and is hereby designated
as the "Sheriff William Earl Hilton Memorial Highway".
(B) The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are hereby
directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation provided local
or private monies are received by the department equal to the department's actual cost for
material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the signage, not to exceed the sum
of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.